Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.240

Corporation's acceptance or rejection of votes, ballots, consents, waivers, or proxy appointments.

(1) If the name executed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

(2) If the name executed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

(a) The shareholder is an entity and the name executed purports to be that of an officer, partner, or agent of the entity;

(b) The name executed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

(c) The name executed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

(d) The name executed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory's authority to execute for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

(e) Two or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name executed purports to be the name of at least one of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

(3) The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the person authorized to count votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of its execution.

(4) Neither the corporation nor the person authorized to count votes, including an inspector of election under RCW 23B.07.035, that accepts or rejects a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or RCW 23B.07.220(2) is liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

(5) Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section, or RCW 23B.07.220(2) is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

[ 2020 c 57 s 54; 2002 c 297 s 26; 2000 c 168 s 3; 1989 c 165 s 72.]